Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2812.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 29-6-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 29-6 entitled "State Aid to
Libraries" is hereby amended to read as follows:
29-6-2. Public library services.
(a) The general assembly makes the following findings:
(1) The Constitution of the State of Rhode Island Article XII of Education, Section 1 states
that it "shall be the duty of the general assembly to promote public schools and public libraries, and
to adopt all means which it may deem necessary and proper to secure to the people the advantages
and opportunities of education and public library services."
(2) Free public libraries are essential to the general enlightenment of citizens in a
democracy;
(3) Free public libraries provide for the cultural, educational, informational, and research
needs of all citizens;
(4) Free public libraries are an integral part of the educational system at all levels and a
source for vocational information and continued learning following the period of formal education;
(5) It is the responsibility of government at all levels to provide adequate financial support
for all free public libraries.
(b) For each city or town, the state’s share to support local public library services shall be
equal to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of both the amount appropriated and expended in the
second preceding fiscal year by the city or town from local tax revenues and funds from the public

library’s private endowment that supplement the municipal appropriation; provided, however, the
state in any year shall not be obligated to match any amount from the endowment that exceeds six
percent (6%) of the three-year (3) average market value, calculated at the end of the calendar year,
of the investments in the endowment. The amount of the grant payable to each municipality in any
year in accordance with this section shall be reduced proportionately in the event that the total of
those grants in any year exceeds the amount appropriated that year for the purposes of this section.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, in fiscal year 2027, the
state shall pay each city and town a fixed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount appropriated
and expended by the city or town in the second preceding fiscal year from local tax revenues and
from the public library's private endowment that supplement the municipal appropriation for public
library services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005438
========
LC005438 - Page 2 of 3